pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Basebol e softbol > Auxiliares de treino para basebol e softbol > Redes de rebatida para basebol e softbol: Redes para gaiolas de batedores de basebol e softbol; Estruturas e kits de postes para gaiolas de batedores; Pacotes para gaiolas de batedores
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Baseball in softball > Pripomočki za vadbo baseballa in softballa > Stojala za odbijanje baseball in softball žogic: Baseball in Softball Mreže za kletke za odbijanje; Kompleti okvirjev in drogov za kletke za udarjanje; Paketi za kletke za udarjanje
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Baseball e softball > Ausili per l'allenamento di baseball e softball > Gabbie per battuta di baseball e softball: Reti per gabbie di battuta da baseball e softball; Strutture e kit di pali per gabbie di battuta; Set per gabbie di battuta
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Bejzbal a softbal > Bejzbalové a softbalové tréningové pomôcky > Bejzbalové a softbalové odpalovacie klietky: Bejzbalové a softbalové sieťky pre odpaľovacie klietky; Rámy a stĺpiky pre odpaľovacie klietky; Balíky odpaľovacích klietok
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Baseball ja softball > Baseball- ja softball-harjoittelun apuvälineet > Baseball- ja softball-lyöntihäkit: Baseballin ja softballin lyöntihäkkiverkot; Lyöntihäkkien kehikot ja pylväspakkaukset; Lyöntihäkkipaketit
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Baseball și softball > Articole de antrenament pentru baseball și softball > Cuști pentru baseball și softball: Fileuri pentru cușcă de batting pentru baseball și softball; Cadre și seturi de stâlpi pentru cușcă de bătaie; Pachete complete pentru cușcă de bătaie
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > 野球・ソフトボール用品 > 野球・ソフトボール練習器具 > 野球・ソフトボール用バッティングケージ: 野球・ソフトボール用バッティングケージネット; バッティングケージ用フレーム・ポールキット; バッティングケージ用パッケージ
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Baseball a softball > Tréninkové pomůcky na baseball a softball > Tréninkové tunely/klece na baseball a softball: Sítě do pálkařských klecí na baseball a softball; Konstrukce a sady tyčí k pálkařským klecím; Sety pálkařských klecí
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Beisbolas ir softbolas > Beisbolo ir softbolo treniruočių pagalbinės priemonės > Beisbolo ir softbolo mušimo narvai: Beisbolo ir softbolo mušimo narvų tinklai; Mušimo narvų rėmai ir stulpų rinkiniai; Mušimo narvų komplektai
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Baseball & Softball > Baseball & Softball Training Aids > Baseball & Softball Batting Cages: Baseball & Softball Batting Cage Nets; Batting Cage Frames & Pole Kits; Batting Cage Packages
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > เบสบอลและซอฟท์บอล > อุปกรณ์ช่วยฝึกซ้อมเบสบอลและซอฟท์บอล > กรงตีเบสบอลและซอฟท์บอล: ตาข่ายกรงซ้อมตีเบสบอลและซอฟต์บอล; โครงและเสากรงซ้อมตี; ชุดกรงซ้อมตี
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Бейсбол и софтбол > Тренировочный инвентарь для бейсбола и софтбола > Закрытые площадки для отработки удара битой по мячу: Сетки для тренировочных клеток (бейсбол и софтбол); Каркасы и наборы стоек для тренировочных клеток; Комплекты тренировочных клеток для бэттинга
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Mπέιζμπολ/σόφτμπολ > Εκπαιδευτικά βοηθήματα μπέιζμπολ & σόφτμπολ > Κλουβιά προπόνησης μπέιζμπολ & σόφτμπολ: Δίχτυα για κλωβούς batting μπέιζμπολ και σόφτμπολ; Σκελετοί και σετ στύλων για κλωβούς batting; Πακέτα για κλωβούς batting
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Baseball i softball > Pomoce treningowe do baseballa i softballa > Klatki do baseballa i softballa: Siatki do klatek treningowych do baseballu i softballu; Ramy i zestawy słupków do klatek treningowych; Zestawy klatek treningowych
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Béisbol y sóftbol > Ayudas para el entrenamiento de béisbol y softbol > Jaulas de bateo para béisbol y sóftbol: Redes para jaulas de bateo de béisbol y sóftbol; Kits de postes y armazones para jaulas de bateo; Paquetes de jaulas de bateo
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Bóng chày & Bóng mềm > Dụng cụ hỗ trợ luyện tập bóng chày & bóng mềm > Chuồng đánh bóng tập bóng chày và bóng mềm: Lưới lồng tập đánh bóng chày và bóng mềm; Bộ cột và khung lồng tập đánh bóng; Trọn bộ lồng tập đánh bóng
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Beisebol e softbol > Auxílios de treinamento para beisebol e softbol > Gaiolas para rebater para beisebol e softbol: Redes de gaiola de rebatidas para beisebol e softbol; Estruturas e kits de postes para gaiola de rebatidas; Pacotes de gaiola de rebatidas
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Baseball & Softball > Baseball- & Softball-Trainingshilfen > Baseball- & Softball-Schlagkäfige: Schlagkäfig-Netze für Baseball & Softball; Schlagkäfig-Gestelle & Stangen-Pakete; Schlagkäfig-Pakete
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Beyzbol ve Softbol > Beyzbol ve Softbol Eğitim Araçları > Beyzbol ve Softbol Vuruş Kafesleri: Beyzbol ve softbol vuruş kafesi fileleri; Vuruş kafesi çerçeve ve direk kitleri; Vuruş kafesi paketleri
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 棒球/垒球用品 > 棒球/垒球训练辅助用品 > 棒球/垒球击球笼: 棒垒球击球笼网; 击球笼框架与立柱套件; 击球笼组合套件
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Baseball és softball > Baseball és softball edzéssegédek > Baseball és softball ütőketrecek: Baseball és softball ütőketrec hálók; Ütőketrec keretek és rúdkészletek; Ütőketrec csomagok
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Бейзбол и софтбол > Помощни средства за тренировки по бейзбол и софтбол > Клетки за батиране за бейзбол и софтбол: Клетки за батиране за бейзбол и софтбол; Рамки и комплекти стълбове за бейзболни тренировъчни клетки; Пълни комплекти бейзболни тренировъчни клетки
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Baseball og softball > Treningshjelpemidler for baseball og softball > Slåbur for baseball og softball: Nett for slagbur til baseball og softball; Rammer og stangsett til slagbur; Pakker for slagbur
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Base-ball et softball > Aides à l'entraînement au baseball et au softball > Cages de frappeur de baseball et de softball: Filets pour cages de frappeur de baseball et de softball; Armatures et kits de poteaux pour cages de frappeur; Ensembles pour cages de frappeur
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Bejzbol i softbol > Pomagala za trening bejzbola i softbola > Kavezi za udaranje za bejzbol i softbol: Mreže za kaveze za udaranje za bejzbol i softbol; Kompleti okvira i šipki za kaveze za udaranje; Paketi za kaveze za udaranje
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Baseball og softball > Baseball og softball – træningshjælpemidler > Baseball og softball – batterbure: Net til batting cages til baseball og softball; Rammer og stangsæt til batting cages; Batting cage-pakker
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 棒球和壘球 > 棒壘球投手訓練輔助用品 > 棒壘球投手打擊練習用品: 棒壘球打擊籠擋網; 打擊籠框架與立柱套組; 打擊籠套組
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Baseball och softball > Träningshjälpmedel för baseboll och softboll > Slagburar för baseball och softball: Nät till slagburar för baseboll och softboll; Ramar och stolpset för slagburar; Paket för slagburar
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 야구/소프트볼 > 야구/소프트볼 훈련 장비 > 야구/소프트볼 타격 연습 케이지: 야구 및 소프트볼 배팅 케이지 네트; 배팅 케이지 프레임 및 폴 키트; 배팅 케이지 패키지
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Honkbal en softbal > Trainingshulpmiddelen voor honkbal en softbal > Slagkooien voor honkbal en softbal: Slagkooinetten voor honkbal en softbal; Frames en paalsets voor slagkooien; Slagkooipakketten